src/pcle_myv-lexc.txt
LEXICON PCLE
а+Pcle+Neg:а # ;
аволь+Pcle+Neg+Emphatic:аволь # ;
ай+Pcle+Neg+Emphatic:ай kal-N ;
апак+Pcle+Neg:апак Tenses-Obl ;
седе+Pcle+Compar:седе # ;
сех+Pcle+Superl:сех # ;
сех+Pcle+Superl+Abl:сехте # ; ! This is a comparative construction
уш+Pcle+Intensifier:уш # ;
